static/hunspell/03.01.2024/bash.aff
FLAG long
SFX U18 Y 645 # существительные Noun
SFX U18 0 м .	+PxSg1
SFX U18 0 ң .	+PxSg2
SFX U18 0 0 .	+PxSg3
SFX U18 0 быҙ .	+PxPl1
SFX U18 0 ғыҙ .	+PxPl2
SFX U18 0 мдың .	+PxSg1+Gen
SFX U18 0 ңдың .	+PxSg2+Gen
SFX U18 0 ның .	+PxSg3+Gen
SFX U18 0 быҙҙың .	+PxPl1+Gen
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙың .	+PxPl2+Gen
SFX U18 0 ма .	+PxSg1+Dat
SFX U18 0 ңа .	+PxSg2+Dat
SFX U18 0 на .	+PxSg3+Dat
SFX U18 0 быҙға .	+PxPl1+Dat
SFX U18 0 ғыҙға .	+PxPl2+Dat
SFX U18 0 мды .	+PxSg1+Acc
SFX U18 0 ңды .	+PxSg2+Acc
SFX U18 0 н .	+PxSg3+Acc
SFX U18 0 быҙҙы .	+PxPl1+Acc
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙы .	+PxPl2+Acc
SFX U18 0 мдан .	+PxSg1+Abl
SFX U18 0 ңдан .	+PxSg2+Abl
SFX U18 0 нан .	+PxSg3+Abl
SFX U18 0 быҙҙан .	+PxPl1+Abl
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙан .	+PxPl2+Abl
SFX U18 0 мда .	+PxSg1+Loc
SFX U18 0 ңда .	+PxSg2+Loc
SFX U18 0 нда .	+PxSg3+Loc
SFX U18 0 быҙҙа .	+PxPl1+Loc
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙа .	+PxPl2+Loc
SFX U18 0 мдыңмы .	+PxSg1+Gen+Q
SFX U18 0 ңдыңмы .	+PxSg2+Gen+Q
SFX U18 0 ныңмы .	+PxSg3+Gen+Q
SFX U18 0 быҙҙыңмы .	+PxPl1+Gen+Q
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙыңмы .	+PxPl2+Gen+Q
SFX U18 0 мамы .	+PxSg1+Dat+Q
SFX U18 0 ңамы .	+PxSg2+Dat+Q
SFX U18 0 намы .	+PxSg3+Dat+Q
SFX U18 0 быҙғамы .	+PxPl1+Dat+Q
SFX U18 0 ғыҙғамы .	+PxPl2+Dat+Q
SFX U18 0 мдымы .	+PxSg1+Acc+Q
SFX U18 0 ңдымы .	+PxSg2+Acc+Q
SFX U18 0 нмы .	+PxSg3+Acc+Q
SFX U18 0 быҙҙымы .	+PxPl1+Acc+Q
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙымы .	+PxPl2+Acc+Q
SFX U18 0 мданмы .	+PxSg1+Abl+Q
SFX U18 0 ңданмы .	+PxSg2+Abl+Q
SFX U18 0 нанмы .	+PxSg3+Abl+Q
SFX U18 0 быҙҙанмы .	+PxPl1+Abl+Q
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙанмы .	+PxPl2+Abl+Q
SFX U18 0 мдамы .	+PxSg1+Loc+Q
SFX U18 0 ңдамы .	+PxSg2+Loc+Q
SFX U18 0 ндамы .	+PxSg3+Loc+Q
SFX U18 0 быҙҙамы .	+PxPl1+Loc+Q
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙамы .	+PxPl2+Loc+Q
SFX U18 0 мдыңмылыр .	+PxSg1+Gen+Q+Indf
SFX U18 0 ңдыңмылыр .	+PxSg2+Gen+Q+Indf
SFX U18 0 ныңмылыр .	+PxSg3+Gen+Q+Indf
SFX U18 0 быҙҙыңмылыр .	+PxPl1+Q+Indf
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙыңмылыр .	+PxPl2+Q+Indf
SFX U18 0 мамылыр .	+PxSg1+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX U18 0 ңамылыр .	+PxSg2+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX U18 0 намылыр .	+PxSg3+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX U18 0 быҙғамылыр .	+PxPl1+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX U18 0 ғыҙғамылыр .	+PxPl2+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX U18 0 мдымылыр .	+PxSg1+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX U18 0 ңдымылыр .	+PxSg2+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX U18 0 нмылыр .	+PxSg3+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX U18 0 быҙҙымылыр .	+PxPl1+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙымылыр .	+PxPl2+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX U18 0 мданмылыр .	+PxSg1+Abl+Q+Indf
SFX U18 0 ңданмылыр .	+PxSg2+Abl+Q+Indf
SFX U18 0 нанмылыр .	+PxSg3+Abl+Q+Indf
SFX U18 0 быҙҙанмылыр .	+PxPl1+Abl+Q+Indf
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙанмылыр .	+PxPl2+Abl+Q+Indf
SFX U18 0 мдамылыр .	+PxSg1+Locl+Q+Indf
SFX U18 0 ңдамылыр .	+PxSg2+Locl+Q+Indf
SFX U18 0 ндамылыр .	+PxSg3+Locl+Q+Indf
SFX U18 0 быҙҙамылыр .	+PxPl1+Locl+Q+Indf
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙамылыр .	+PxPl2+Locl+Q+Indf
SFX U18 0 мдыңдыр .	+PxSg1+Gen+Indf
SFX U18 0 ңдыңдыр .	+PxSg2+Gen+Indf
SFX U18 0 ныңдыр .	+PxSg3+Gen+Indf
SFX U18 0 быҙҙыңдыр .	+PxPl1+Gen+Indf
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙыңдыр .	+PxPl2+Gen+Indf
SFX U18 0 малыр .	+PxSg1+Dat+Indf
SFX U18 0 ңалыр .	+PxSg2+Dat+Indf
SFX U18 0 налыр .	+PxSg3+Dat+Indf
SFX U18 0 быҙғалыр .	+PxPl1+Dat+Indf
SFX U18 0 ғыҙғалыр .	+PxPl2+Dat+Indf
SFX U18 0 мдылыр .	+PxSg1+Acc+Indf
SFX U18 0 ңдылыр .	+PxSg2+Acc+Indf
SFX U18 0 ндыр .	+PxSg3+Acc+Indf
SFX U18 0 быҙҙылыр .	+PxPl1+Acc+Indf
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙылыр .	+PxPl2+Acc+Indf
SFX U18 0 мдандыр .	+PxSg1+Abl+Indf
SFX U18 0 ңдандыр .	+PxSg2+Abl+Indf
SFX U18 0 нандыр .	+PxSg3+Abl+Indf
SFX U18 0 быҙҙандыр .	+PxPl1+Abl+Indf
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙандыр .	+PxPl2+Abl+Indf
SFX U18 0 мдалыр .	+PxSg1+Loc+Indf
SFX U18 0 ңдалыр .	+PxSg2+Loc+Indf
SFX U18 0 ндалыр .	+PxSg3+Loc+Indf
SFX U18 0 быҙҙалыр .	+PxPl1+Loc+Indf
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙалыр .	+PxPl2+Loc+Indf
SFX U18 0 мдыңсы .	+PxSg1+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 ңдыңсы .	+PxSg2+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 ныңсы .	+PxSg3+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 быҙҙыңсы .	+PxPl1+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙыңсы .	+PxPl2+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 масы .	+PxSg1+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 ңасы .	+PxSg2+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 насы .	+PxSg3+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 быҙғасы .	+PxPl1+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 ғыҙғасы .	+PxPl2+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 мдысы .	+PxSg1+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 ңдысы .	+PxSg2+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 нсы .	+PxSg3+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 быҙҙысы .	+PxPl1+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙысы .	+PxPl2+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 мдансы .	+PxSg1+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 ңдансы .	+PxSg2+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 нансы .	+PxSg3+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 быҙҙансы .	+PxPl1+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙансы .	+PxPl2+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 мдасы .	+PxSg1+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 ңдасы .	+PxSg2+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 ндасы .	+PxSg3+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 быҙҙасы .	+PxPl1+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙасы .	+PxPl2+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 ммы .	+PxSg1+Q
SFX U18 0 ңмы .	+PxSg2+Q
SFX U18 0 мы .	+PxSg3+Q
SFX U18 0 быҙмы .	+PxPl1+Q
SFX U18 0 ғыҙмы .	+PxPl2+Q
SFX U18 0 ммылыр .	+PxSg1+Q+Indf
SFX U18 0 ңмылыр .	+PxSg2+Q+Indf
SFX U18 0 мылыр .	+PxSg3+Q+Indf
SFX U18 0 быҙмылыр .	+PxPl1+Q+Indf
SFX U18 0 ғыҙмылыр .	+PxPl2+Q+Indf
SFX U18 0 мдыр .	+PxSg1+Indf
SFX U18 0 ңдыр .	+PxSg2+Indf
SFX U18 0 лыр .	+PxSg3+Indf
SFX U18 0 быҙҙыр .	+PxPl1+Indf
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙыр .	+PxPl2+Indf
SFX U18 0 мсы .	+PxSg1+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 ңсы .	+PxSg2+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 сы .	+PxSg3+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 быҙсы .	+PxPl1+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 ғыҙсы .	+PxPl2+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 мдыҡы .	+PxSg1+Poss
SFX U18 0 ңдыҡы .	+PxSg2+Poss
SFX U18 0 ныҡы .	+PxSg3+Poss
SFX U18 0 быҙҙыҡы .	+PxPl1+Poss
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙыҡы .	+PxPl2+Poss
SFX U18 0 мдыҡының .	+PxSg1+Poss+Gen
SFX U18 0 ңдыҡының .	+PxSg2+Poss+Gen
SFX U18 0 ныҡының .	+PxSg3+Poss+Gen
SFX U18 0 быҙҙыҡының .	+PxPl1+Poss+Gen
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙыҡының .	+PxPl2+Poss+Gen
SFX U18 0 мдыҡына .	+PxSg1+Poss+Dat
SFX U18 0 ңдыҡына .	+PxSg2+Poss+Dat
SFX U18 0 ныҡына .	+PxSg3+Poss+Dat
SFX U18 0 быҙҙыҡына .	+PxPl1+Poss+Dat
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙыҡына .	+PxPl2+Poss+Dat
SFX U18 0 мдыҡын .	+PxSg1+Poss+Acc
SFX U18 0 ңдыҡын .	+PxSg2+Poss+Acc
SFX U18 0 ныҡын .	+PxSg3+Poss+Acc
SFX U18 0 быҙҙыҡын .	+PxPl1+Poss+Acc
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙыҡын .	+PxPl2+Poss+Acc
SFX U18 0 мдыҡынан .	+PxSg1+Poss+Acc
SFX U18 0 ңдыҡынан .	+PxSg2+Poss+Acc
SFX U18 0 ныҡынан .	+PxSg3+Poss+Acc
SFX U18 0 быҙҙыҡынан .	+PxPl1+Poss+Acc
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙыҡынан .	+PxPl2+Poss+Acc
SFX U18 0 мдыҡында .	+PxSg1+Poss+Loc
SFX U18 0 ңдыҡында .	+PxSg2+Poss+Loc
SFX U18 0 ныҡында .	+PxSg3+Poss+Loc
SFX U18 0 быҙҙыҡында .	+PxPl1+Poss+Loc
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙыҡында .	+PxPl2+Poss+Loc
SFX U18 0 мдыҡыныңмы .	+PxSg1+Poss+Gen+Q
SFX U18 0 ңдыҡыныңмы .	+PxSg2+Poss+Gen+Q
SFX U18 0 ныҡыныңмы .	+PxSg3+Poss+Gen+Q
SFX U18 0 быҙҙыҡыныңмы .	+PxPl1+Poss+Gen+Q
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙыҡыныңмы .	+PxPl2+Poss+Gen+Q
SFX U18 0 мдыҡынамы .	+PxSg1+Poss+Dat+Q
SFX U18 0 ңдыҡынамы .	+PxSg2+Poss+Dat+Q
SFX U18 0 ныҡынамы .	+PxSg3+Poss+Dat+Q
SFX U18 0 быҙҙыҡынамы .	+PxPl1+Poss+Dat+Q
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙыҡынамы .	+PxPl2+Poss+Dat+Q
SFX U18 0 мдыҡынмы .	+PxSg1+Poss+Acc+Q
SFX U18 0 ңдыҡынмы .	+PxSg2+Poss+Acc+Q
SFX U18 0 ныҡынмы .	+PxSg3+Poss+Acc+Q
SFX U18 0 быҙҙыҡынмы .	+PxPl1+Poss+Acc+Q
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙыҡынмы .	+PxPl2+Poss+Acc+Q
SFX U18 0 мдыҡынанмы .	+PxSg1+Poss+Abl+Q
SFX U18 0 ңдыҡынанмы .	+PxSg2+Poss+Abl+Q
SFX U18 0 ныҡынанмы .	+PxSg3+Poss+Abl+Q
SFX U18 0 быҙҙыҡынанмы .	+PxPl1+Poss+Abl+Q
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙыҡынанмы .	+PxPl2+Poss+Abl+Q
SFX U18 0 мдыҡындамы .	+PxSg1+Poss+Loc+Q
SFX U18 0 ңдыҡындамы .	+PxSg2+Poss+Loc+Q
SFX U18 0 ныҡындамы .	+PxSg3+Poss+Loc+Q
SFX U18 0 быҙҙыҡындамы .	+PxPl1+Poss+Loc+Q
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙыҡындамы .	+PxPl2+Poss+Loc+Q
SFX U18 0 мдыҡыныңдыр .	+PxSg1+Poss+Gen+Indf
SFX U18 0 ңдыҡыныңдыр .	+PxSg2+Poss+Gen+Indf
SFX U18 0 ныҡыныңдыр .	+PxSg3+Poss+Gen+Indf
SFX U18 0 быҙҙыҡыныңдыр .	+PxPl1+Poss+Gen+Indf
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙыҡыныңдыр .	+PxPl2+Poss+Gen+Indf
SFX U18 0 мдыҡыналыр .	+PxSg1+Poss+Dat+Indf
SFX U18 0 ңдыҡыналыр .	+PxSg2+Poss+Dat+Indf
SFX U18 0 ныҡыналыр .	+PxSg3+Poss+Dat+Indf
SFX U18 0 быҙҙыҡыналыр .	+PxPl1+Poss+Dat+Indf
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙыҡыналыр .	+PxPl2+Poss+Dat+Indf
SFX U18 0 мдыҡындыр .	+PxSg1+Poss+Acc+Indf
SFX U18 0 ңдыҡындыр .	+PxSg2+Poss+Acc+Indf
SFX U18 0 ныҡындыр .	+PxSg3+Poss+Acc+Indf
SFX U18 0 быҙҙыҡындыр .	+PxPl1+Poss+Acc+Indf
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙыҡындыр .	+PxPl2+Poss+Acc+Indf
SFX U18 0 мдыҡынандыр .	+PxSg1+Poss+Abl+Indf
SFX U18 0 ңдыҡынандыр .	+PxSg2+Poss+Abl+Indf
SFX U18 0 ныҡынандыр .	+PxSg3+Poss+Abl+Indf
SFX U18 0 быҙҙыҡынандыр .	+PxPl1+Poss+Abl+Indf
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙыҡынандыр .	+PxPl2+Poss+Abl+Indf
SFX U18 0 мдыҡындалыр .	+PxSg1+Poss+Loc+Indf
SFX U18 0 ңдыҡындалыр .	+PxSg2+Poss+Loc+Indf
SFX U18 0 ныҡындалыр .	+PxSg3+Poss+Loc+Indf
SFX U18 0 быҙҙыҡындалыр .	+PxPl1+Poss+Loc+Indf
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙыҡындалыр .	+PxPl2+Poss+Loc+Indf
SFX U18 0 мдыҡыныңсы .	+PxSg1+Poss+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 ңдыҡыныңсы .	+PxSg2+Poss+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 ныҡыныңсы .	+PxSg3+Poss+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 быҙҙыҡыныңсы .	+PxPl1+Poss+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙыҡыныңсы .	+PxPl2+Poss+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 мдыҡынасы .	+PxSg1+Poss+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 ңдыҡынасы .	+PxSg2+Poss+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 ныҡынасы .	+PxSg3+Poss+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 быҙҙыҡынасы .	+PxPl1+Poss+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙыҡынасы .	+PxPl2+Poss+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 мдыҡынсы .	+PxSg1+Poss+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 ңдыҡынсы .	+PxSg2+Poss+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 ныҡынсы .	+PxSg3+Poss+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 быҙҙыҡынсы .	+PxPl1+Poss+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙыҡынсы .	+PxPl2+Poss+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 мдыҡынансы .	+PxSg1+Poss+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 ңдыҡынансы .	+PxSg2+Poss+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 ныҡынансы .	+PxSg3+Poss+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 быҙҙыҡынансы .	+PxPl1+Poss+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙыҡынансы .	+PxPl2+Poss+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 мдыҡындасы .	+PxSg1+Poss+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 ңдыҡындасы .	+PxSg2+Poss+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 ныҡындасы .	+PxSg3+Poss+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 быҙҙыҡындасы .	+PxPl1+Poss+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙыҡындасы .	+PxPl2+Poss+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 мдыҡымы .	+PxSg1+Poss +Q
SFX U18 0 ңдыҡымы .	+PxSg2+Poss +Q
SFX U18 0 ныҡымы .	+PxSg3+Poss +Q
SFX U18 0 быҙҙыҡымы .	+PxPl1+Poss +Q
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙыҡымы .	+PxPl2+Poss +Q
SFX U18 0 мдыҡылыр .	+PxSg1+Poss +Indf
SFX U18 0 ңдыҡылыр .	+PxSg2+Poss +Indf
SFX U18 0 ныҡылыр .	+PxSg3+Poss +Indf
SFX U18 0 быҙҙыҡылыр .	+PxPl1+Poss +Indf
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙыҡылыр .	+PxPl2+Poss +Indf
SFX U18 0 мдыҡысы .	+PxSg1+Poss +Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 ңдыҡысы .	+PxSg2+Poss +Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 ныҡысы .	+PxSg3+Poss +Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 быҙҙыҡысы .	+PxPl1+Poss +Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙыҡысы .	+PxPl2+Poss +Clt/сы
SFX U18 0 мдай .	+PxSg1+Der/дай
SFX U18 0 ңдай .	+PxSg2+Der/дай
SFX U18 0 лай .	+PxSg3+Der/дай
SFX U18 0 быҙҙай .	+PxPl1+Der/дай
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙай .	+PxPl2+Der/дай
SFX U18 0 мса .	+PxSg1+Der/са
SFX U18 0 ңса .	+PxSg2+Der/са
SFX U18 0 са .	+PxSg3+Der/са
SFX U18 0 быҙса .	+PxPl1+Der/са
SFX U18 0 ғыҙса .	+PxPl2+Der/са
SFX U18 0 мдайҙар .	+PxSg1+Der/дай+Pl
SFX U18 0 ңдайҙар .	+PxSg2+Der/дай+Pl
SFX U18 0 лайҙар .	+PxSg3+Der/дай+Pl
SFX U18 0 быҙҙайҙар .	+PxPl1+Der/дай+Pl
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙайҙар .	+PxPl2+Der/дай+Pl
SFX U18 0 мсалар .	+PxSg1+Der/са+Pl
SFX U18 0 ңсалар .	+PxSg2+Der/са+Pl
SFX U18 0 салар .	+PxSg3+Der/са+Pl
SFX U18 0 быҙсалар .	+PxPl1+Der/са+Pl
SFX U18 0 ғыҙсалар .	+PxPl2+Der/са+Pl
SFX U18 0 мдайҙар .	+PxSg1+Der/дай+Pl+Gen
SFX U18 0 ңдайҙар .	+PxSg2+Der/дай+Pl+Gen
SFX U18 0 лайҙар .	+PxSg3+Der/дай+Pl+Gen
SFX U18 0 быҙҙайҙар .	+PxPl1+Der/дай+Pl+Gen
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙайҙар .	+PxPl2+Der/дай+Pl+Gen
SFX U18 0 мдайҙарға .	+PxSg1+Der/дай+Pl+Dat
SFX U18 0 ңдайҙарға .	+PxSg2+Der/дай+Pl+Dat
SFX U18 0 лайҙарға .	+PxSg3+Der/дай+Pl+Dat
SFX U18 0 быҙҙайҙарға .	+PxPl1+Der/дай+Pl+Dat
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙайҙарға .	+PxPl2+Der/дай+Pl+Dat
SFX U18 0 мдайҙарҙы .	+PxSg1+Der/дай+Pl+Acc
SFX U18 0 ңдайҙарҙы .	+PxSg2+Der/дай+Pl+Acc
SFX U18 0 лайҙарҙы .	+PxSg3+Der/дай+Pl+Acc
SFX U18 0 быҙҙайҙарҙы .	+PxPl1+Der/дай+Pl+Acc
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙайҙарҙы .	+PxPl2+Der/дай+Pl+Acc
SFX U18 0 мдайҙарҙан .	+PxSg1+Der/дай+Pl+Abl
SFX U18 0 ңдайҙарҙан .	+PxSg2+Der/дай+Pl+Abl
SFX U18 0 лайҙарҙан .	+PxSg3+Der/дай+Pl+Abl
SFX U18 0 быҙҙайҙарҙан .	+PxPl1+Der/дай+Pl+Abl
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙайҙарҙан .	+PxPl2+Der/дай+Pl+Abl
SFX U18 0 мдайҙарҙа .	+PxSg1+Der/дай+Pl+Loc
SFX U18 0 ңдайҙарҙа .	+PxSg2+Der/дай+Pl+Loc
SFX U18 0 лайҙарҙа .	+PxSg3+Der/дай+Pl+Loc
SFX U18 0 быҙҙайҙарҙа .	+PxPl1+Der/дай+Pl+Loc
SFX U18 0 ғыҙҙайҙарҙа .	+PxPl2+Der/дай+Pl+Loc
SFX U18 0 мсаларҙың .	+PxSg1+Der/са+Pl+Gen
SFX U18 0 ңсаларҙың .	+PxSg2+Der/са+Pl+Gen
SFX U18 0 саларҙың .	+PxSg3+Der/са+Pl+Gen
SFX U18 0 быҙсаларҙың .	+PxPl1+Der/са+Pl+Gen
